Hawaii statutes.
[§487J-3] Penalties; civil action.
(a) Any business that violates any provision of this chapter shall be subject
to penalties of not more than $2,500 for each violation. The attorney general
or the executive director of the office of consumer protection may bring an
action pursuant to this section. No such action may be brought against a
government agency.

(b) In addition to any penalty provided for in
subsection (a), any business that violates any provision of this chapter shall
be liable to the injured party in an amount equal to the sum of any actual
damages sustained by the injured party as a result of the violation. The court
in any action brought under this section may award reasonable attorneys' fees
to the prevailing party. No such action may be brought against a government
agency.

(c) The penalties provided in this section
shall be cumulative to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws
of this State. [L 2006, c 137, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next